Vermont, session 2025-2026, H291.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 3754 is amended to read:
§ 3754. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD
(a) The Board shall meet at least annually, prior to February 1, to review all
past current use land values for agricultural land and managed forestland
recommended by past boards, to review the criteria for lands previously
established, and to establish new criteria and values as legislation and land
VT LEG #379413 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.291
2025 Page 2 of 3
management practices may indicate, to establish a schedule of criteria and
values to be recommended for the current tax year, and to recommend such
changes and improvement in the administration of this subchapter as
experience and public reaction may recommend. The Board’s criteria and
recommended values may reflect the class, type, grade, and location of the
land, together with its productive capacity and the income-producing capability
of agricultural land and forestland. When recommending values for eligible
land for the current tax year, the Board shall recommend that land posted
against hunting, fishing, or trapping under 10 V.S.A. § 5201 shall pay a higher
tax rate for enrolled lands equal to 25 percent of the difference between a
parcel’s use value and the grand list value.
(b) Annually, on or before October 15, the Board shall hold a public
hearing and such other hearings as they deem necessary to receive public
testimony on the criteria and values for use value appraisals in the coming tax
year and on the administration of this subchapter.
(c) Prior to February 15 each year, the Board shall submit to the Director
its recommended schedule of criteria and values for use value appraisals for
the current tax year. The Director shall then distribute the valuations to all
municipalities, towns, and gores, and the assessing officials shall appraise
qualifying agricultural and managed forestland at these use values.
VT LEG #379413 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.291
2025 Page 3 of 3
(d) The Board may adopt rules under the authority granted to agencies by
3 V.S.A. chapter 25, subchapter 1 to interpret and carry out the provisions of
this subchapter.
(e) A member of the Board shall not vote on any issue on which the
member, or when applicable the member’s agency, has a conflict of interest.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 3756 is amended to read:
§ 3756. QUALIFICATION FOR USE VALUE APPRAISAL
* * *
(k) Enrolled land posted under 10 V.S.A. § 5201 against hunting, fishing,
or trapping shall be assessed a higher tax rate than for agricultural land or
managed forestland as recommended by the Board under section 3754 of this
title.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379413 v.1